Hawaii statutes.
[§321-35] Department of
education student physical examination follow-up assistance and consultations.
(a) No later than the end of the seventh grade school year, the
department of health shall contact the parents or guardians of students listed
pursuant to section 302A-1159(b) and provide information to assist those
persons in obtaining a physical examination for the student pursuant to section
302A-1159(b).

(b) Subject to the availability of funds, the
department of health shall also provide follow-up notice to or consultations
with the parents or guardians of the students contacted pursuant to subsection
(a) on the benefits of a healthy lifestyle and preventative health care and the
availability of health care coverage under the federal Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act or medicaid. [L 2016, c 185, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next